Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1573.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 2003, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 77, O.S.L. 2025 (62 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 2003), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2003. A. Monies appropriated by law to the Oklahoma


Water Resources Board for the purpose of funding the Rural Economic


Action Plan grant program and the Rural Economic Action Plan Water


Projects Fund shall be administered by the Oklahoma Water Resources


Board as provided by this section.


B. The monies referred to in subsection A of this section shall


be distributed to eligible cities and towns, unincorporated areas,


irrigation districts, rural water districts, or other qualified

Req. No. 3222 Page 1


entities located within the areas represented by the following


organizations:


1. Association of Central Oklahoma Governments (ACOG);


2. Association of South Central Oklahoma Governments (ASCOG);


3. Central Oklahoma Economic Development District (COEDD);


4. Eastern Oklahoma Economic Development District (EOEDD)


(EODD);


5. Grand Gateway Economic Development Association (GGEDA);


6. Indian Nations Council of Governments (INCOG);


7. Kiamichi Economic Development District of Oklahoma (KEDDO);


8. Northern Oklahoma Development Association Authority (NODA);


9. Oklahoma Economic Development Association Authority (OEDA);


10. Southern Oklahoma Development Association (SODA); and


11. South Western Oklahoma Development Authority (SWODA).


C. The monies referred to in subsection A of this section shall


not be expended for the benefit of cities or towns with a population


in excess of seven thousand (7,000) persons according to the latest


Federal Decennial Census. Funds may also be expended for any city


or town with a population below seven thousand (7,000) persons based


upon the current population estimate according to the U.S. Census


Bureau. Funds may be expended for such cities and towns until the


next following Federal Decennial Census. Any municipality may enter


into an agreement with an entity described in subsection B of this


section to apply for available funds described by this section if

Req. No. 3222 Page 2


the municipality is located within the area served by the entity.


Upon approval of the application, funds shall be paid to the


municipality requesting the funds.


D. An entity described in subsection B of this section may


apply for a grant to be used for the benefit of an unincorporated


area within a county served by that entity if the area benefited


does not contain a population in excess of seven thousand (7,000)


persons. Any county may enter into an agreement with an entity


described in subsection B of this section if the county is located


within the area served by the entity. Upon approval of the


application, funds shall be paid to the county requesting the funds.


E. The monies referred to in subsection A of this section may


be expended for water quality projects, including, but not limited


to, sewer line construction or repair and related storm or sanitary


sewer projects, water line construction or repair, improvements and


repairs to existing water infrastructure of rural water districts


and irrigation districts, water treatment, water acquisition,


distribution or recovery and related projects.


F. Any city or town with a population less than one thousand


seven hundred fifty (1,750) persons according to the latest Federal


Decennial Census shall have a higher priority for funds allocated by


the Oklahoma Water Resources Board from the amount referred to in


subsection A of this section than jurisdictions of greater size.


Among such cities or towns, those municipalities having relatively

Req. No. 3222 Page 3


weaker fiscal capacity shall have a priority for project funding in


preference to other municipalities.


G. The Oklahoma Water Resources Board shall establish ten


separate accounts containing one-tenth (1/10) of the amount annually


appropriated to the Rural Economic Action Plan Water Projects Fund


per account. Each account shall be available for distribution to


qualified entities located within the area served by entities


described in subsection A of Section 2007 of this title or for


distribution to benefit unincorporated areas with the exception of


one account which shall be divided equally into two subaccounts.


Each one of the two subaccounts shall be available for distribution


to qualified entities located within the respective jurisdiction of


one of the entities described by subsection B of Section 2007 of


this title or for distribution to benefit unincorporated areas. No


funds deposited into one account or subaccount shall be transferred


to any other account. The total expenditure from any one account or


subaccount for each fiscal year may not exceed the amount of funds


available to each account as may be provided by law.


H. No city, town or other entity to which funds will be awarded


pursuant to this section shall be required to provide any form of


match to obtain the funds, whether through cash, services or any


other method.


I. The Oklahoma Water Resources Board shall not be allowed to


retain any of the funds referred to in subsection A of this section

Req. No. 3222 Page 4


for administration. All such funds shall be distributed to eligible


entities as authorized by law.


J. In order to ensure fair and equitable distribution of the


funds referred to in subsection A of this section, the Oklahoma


Water Resources Board shall promulgate rules for administering,


determining priority of, approving and funding applications for such


funds. The rules shall implement the provisions of this section


including the following:


1. No qualified entity shall be approved nor funded for more


than Three Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($350,000.00) from such


funds in any twelve-month period;


2. If a qualified entity has previously been approved for or


received such funds and makes a subsequent application, that


subsequent application may be assigned lower priority than an


application by qualified entities who have not previously been


approved for or received such funds;


3. In order to prevent substantially the same entity or area


from receiving an undue advantage, a political subdivision and all


its public trusts and similar subordinate entities together shall be


treated as one and the same qualified entity; provided rural water


or sewer districts shall not be construed to be subordinate entities


of counties unless the effect would be to make multiple grants to


substantially the same entity or service area; and



Req. No. 3222 Page 5


4. The Oklahoma Water Resources Board may establish limited


time periods for processing applications for available funds.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3222 QD 1/12/2026 10:18:45 PM

































Req. No. 3222 Page 6